Utah statutes.
59-12-354.    Collection of tax -- Administrative fee -- Penalties -- Commission to interpret, audit, and adjudicate transient room tax.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3), the tax authorized under this part shall be administered, collected, and enforced in accordance with:

(a)  the same procedures used to administer, collect, and enforce the tax under:

(i)  Part 1, Tax Collection; or

(ii)  Part 2, Local Sales and Use Tax Act; and

(b)  Chapter 1, General Taxation Policies.

(2)  Notwithstanding Section 59-12-206, a municipality imposing a tax under this part:

(a)  may collect the tax and is not required to:

(i)  transmit revenues generated by the tax to the commission; or

(ii)  contract with the commission to collect the tax;

(b)  shall report the revenues it collects to the commission as provided in Sections 59-12-211 through 59-12-215; and

(c)  subject to the limitations of Subsections (4) and (5), may adopt an ordinance imposing penalties and interest on a person who:

(i)  is required to pay the tax under this part; and

(ii)  does not remit the tax to the collecting agent in a timely manner.

(d) (i)  If the commission collects a tax under this part, the commission:

(A)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(d)(i)(B), shall distribute the revenues generated by the tax to the municipality within which the revenues were generated; and

(B)  notwithstanding Subsection (2)(d)(i)(A), may retain an amount of tax collected under this part of not to exceed the lesser of:

(I)  1.5%; or

(II)  an amount equal to the cost to the commission of administering this part.

(ii)  Any amount the commission retains under Subsection (2)(d)(i)(B) shall be:

(A)  placed in the Sales and Use Tax Administrative Fees Account; and

(B)  used as provided in Subsection 59-12-206(2).

(3)  A tax under this part is not subject to Section 59-12-107.1 or 59-12-123 or Subsections 59-12-205(2) through (6).

(4)  A governing body of a municipality adopting an ordinance imposing penalties and interest under Subsection (2)(c) may impose penalties and interest in amounts that are less than or equal to the penalties and interest rates authorized for the commission under Sections 59-1-401 and 59-1-402.

(5)  A municipality may adopt an ordinance imposing penalties and interest under Subsection (2)(c) only if the municipality does not contract with the commission to collect the tax.

(6)  If a municipality elects to collect the tax as provided in Subsection (2), the commission shall interpret, audit, and adjudicate the tax imposed under this part.

